District of Columbia statutes.
22-1311

Allowing dogs to go at large.

(a)

If any owner or possessor of a fierce or dangerous dog shall permit the same to go at large, knowing said dog to be fierce or dangerous, to the danger or annoyance of the inhabitants, he shall upon conviction thereof, be punished by a fine not exceeding $5,000; and if such animal shall attack or bite any person, the owner or possessor thereof shall, on conviction, be punished by a fine not exceeding $10,000, and in addition to such punishment the court shall adjudge and order that such animal be forthwith delivered to the poundmaster, and said poundmaster is hereby authorized and directed to kill such animal so delivered to him.

(b)

If any owner or possessor of a female dog shall permit her to go at large in the District of Columbia while in heat, he shall, upon conviction thereof, be punished by a fine not exceeding $20.

June 19, 1878, 20 Stat. 174, ch. 323, § 9
June 30, 1902, 32 Stat. 547, ch. 1332
Oct. 18, 1988, D.C. Law 7-176, § 7(f), 35 DCR 4787
1981 Ed., § 22-1111.
1973 Ed., § 22-1111.